Maine, session 132, LD1644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §7016 is enacted to read:
§7016. Hotbox detectors
Beginning January 1, 2027, a hotbox detector must be installed every 20 miles on a
railroad line that operates in the State on which a passenger train operates. For purposes
of this section, "hotbox detector" means a system of sensors that monitor and identify
overheated axle bearings of a train using an infrared thermal detection system as wheelsets
pass over the detector.